Connecticut, session 2026, SB00395.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) There is established a task force to
study (1) efforts to achieve one hundred per cent voter participation in
this state by January 1, 2030, (2) means of enhancing civic engagement
generally in this state, (3) experiences of jurisdictions that have enacted
policies to require citizens to vote as a civic duty, (4) potential
implementation options in pursuit of achieving such one hundred per
cent voter participation goal, (5) needs of registrars of voters, town
clerks and other municipal officials in administering elections in which
one hundred per cent of voters participate, and (6) state and municipal
budgetary resources that may be required to achieve such one hundred
per cent voter participation goal.
(b) The task force shall consist of the following members:
SB395 / File No. 497 1

SB395 File No. 497
(1) One appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives;
(2) One appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate;
(3) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives;
(4) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate;
(5) One appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives;
(6) One appointed by the minority leader of the Senate;
(7) The Secretary of the State, or the Secretary's designee; and
(8) Two appointed by the Governor.
(c) Any member of the task force appointed under subdivision (1),
(2), (3), (4), (5) or (6) of subsection (b) of this section may be a member
of the General Assembly.
(d) All initial appointments to the task force shall be made not later
than August 1, 2026. Any vacancy shall be filled by the appointing
authority.
(e) The speaker of the House of Representatives and the president pro
tempore of the Senate shall select the chairpersons of the task force from
among the members of the task force. Such chairpersons shall schedule
the first meeting of the task force, which shall be held not later than
September 1, 2026.
(f) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to elections
shall serve as administrative staff of the task force.
(g) Not later than February 1, 2027, the task force shall submit a report
on its findings and recommendations, including potential legislation to
appropriate funds or provide other resources to municipalities for the
SB395 / File No. 497 2

SB395 File No. 497
purposes of increasing voter participation, to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to elections, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
of the general statutes. The task force shall terminate on the date that it
submits such report or February 1, 2027, whichever is later.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) Subject to the provisions of title 9
of the general statutes and section 7-192a of the general statutes, any
municipality may, within existing resources, establish a pilot program
to promote the goal of achieving one hundred per cent voter
participation in such municipality. Such pilot program may include
efforts to enhance civic engagement, including, but not limited to, the
development and conduct of a voter outreach and education campaign
within such municipality.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 New section
GAE Joint Favorable
SB395 / File No. 497 3

SB395 File No. 497
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Various Municipalities Potential See Below See Below
Cost
Explanation
The bill empowers municipalities to create a pilot program to achieve
100% voter participation, resulting in a potential cost to municipalities
beginning in FY 27. The exact cost will depend on the number of
municipalities that choose to establish a pilot program under the
legislation and the components of the pilot programs.
The bill additionally establishes a task force to study a variety of
topics related to increasing voter participation, which has no fiscal
impact to the state or municipalities, as the task force has sufficient
expertise to meet the bill's requirements.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future, subject to the number of municipalities that
establish pilot programs.
SB395 / File No. 497 4

SB395 File No. 497
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 395
AN ACT STUDYING EFFORTS TO INCREASE VOTER
PARTICIPATION AND AUTHORIZING MUNICIPAL PILOT
PROGRAMS TO PROMOTE SUCH EFFORTS.